Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 7. Municipal Revolving Fund.

§ 21-33-401.
Municipal revolving fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund designated as the “Municipal Revolving Fund.”

The Municipal Revolving Fund shall not be considered as a surplus or available funds when adopting a balanced budget as required by law. The State Treasurer shall invest all sums in the Municipal Revolving Fund not needed for the purposes provided for in this section in certificates of deposit, repurchase agreements and other securities as authorized in Section 27-105-33(d) or 7-9-103, as the State Treasurer may determine to yield the highest market rate available. Interest earned on this fund shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the State General Fund.

The Municipal Revolving Fund shall be distributed annually, during the month of October, to all municipalities on a population basis, using the latest federal census in computations, taking into consideration the entire population of each municipality in the state, and taking into consideration municipalities that have been incorporated since the last federal census, or will be incorporated before the next federal census, in which case the population shall be the official count used in procuring the charter of incorporation, and also taking into consideration any county seat that is not an incorporated municipality as though the county seat were an incorporated municipality. In making distribution to an unincorporated county seat, however, the funds computed to be due to the county seat shall be paid to the county treasury in which the county seat is located.

Funds made available to municipalities under the provisions of this section may be used for any lawful municipal purpose, except that where funds are made available by reason of the location of an unincorporated county seat in any county, the board of supervisors in that county shall use the funds for road, bridge and street construction or maintenance.

Unexpended funds in the Municipal Revolving Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund but shall remain in the fund for use under this section; provided, however, in fiscal year 2009 the provisions of this subsection shall not be applicable until the Working Cash-Stabilization Fund, created in Section 27-103-203, balance has reached a level of funding that is seven and one-half percent (7-1/2%) of the General Fund appropriations for such fiscal year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3742-51; Laws, 1958, ch. 528, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1970, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 165; Laws, 2008, ch. 455, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2008.